Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin U.S. HIGHWAY 14 INTERSECTION IMPROVEMENTS; APPROPRIATION AND TRUNK HIGHWAY BOND SALE AUTHORIZATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation; trunk highway bond proceeds. new text end new text begin $2,400,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for trunk highway bond eligible portions of a project to conduct environmental analysis, predesign, and final design of a project to replace at-grade intersections and traffic signals with grade-separated interchanges along marked U.S. Highway 14, including but not limited to intersections with Olmsted County State-Aid Highway 3 and Olmsted County State-Aid Highway 5, in the city of Byron. Any amount remaining after substantial completion of environmental analysis, predesign, design, and engineering work may be applied to the state's share to acquire right-of-way for and to construct, furnish, and equip these interchanges and associated infrastructure and road work to accommodate these interchanges. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in subdivision 1 from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $2,400,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 167.50 to 167.52, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XIV, section 11, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received from the sale of the bonds, must be deposited in the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund. new text end